Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4007.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [145.68] VACCINE REQUIREMENTS PROHIBITED. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) The terms defined in this subdivision have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Communicable disease" means a disease or condition the infectious agent of which may pass or be carried, directly or indirectly, from the body of one person to the body of another. new text end new text begin (c) "Political subdivision" means a county, statutory or home rule charter city, town, school district, or board, commission, district, or authority created according to law, ordinance, or charter provision. new text end new text begin (d) "State agency" means an entity in the executive, judicial, or legislative branch of state government. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Vaccine requirements prohibited. new text end new text begin (a) Except as provided in subdivision 3, no state agency or political subdivision may adopt or enforce a law, rule, policy, order, resolution, or other regulation requiring individuals to be vaccinated against a communicable disease or to show proof of vaccination against a communicable disease. new text end new text begin (b) No business operating in Minnesota may adopt a policy, order, resolution, or other regulation, or enforce a law, rule, policy, order, resolution, or other regulation requiring individuals to be vaccinated against a communicable disease or to show proof of vaccination against a communicable disease in order to enter into, work at, provide services at, or receive services at the business. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Exceptions. new text end new text begin This section does not apply to vaccine requirements established in section 121A.15 or 135A.14, or in Minnesota Rules, chapter 4604. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end